Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202519-1204
Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund; created; use; investment.

The Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund is created. The Department of Water, Energy, and Environment shall use the fund for the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Grant Program. The fund shall include transfers as directed by the Legislature, money from grants returned under section 19-1203, and money from private contributions and other sources provided for purposes of the program. Any money in the Revitalize Rural Nebraska Fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest earned on the fund shall be used for the program.

Laws 2023, LB531, § 4;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 43.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.